Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9303
Minor child; incapacitated person; representation; assistance in securing rights.

(1) A home care consumer who is a minor child shall be represented by his or her parent or guardian. Such parent or guardian shall act on behalf of the minor child in securing the minor child’s rights under the Home Care Consumer Bill of Rights Act.

(2) A home care consumer who has been found by a court to be an incapacitated person shall be represented by a guardian. Such guardian shall act on behalf of the incapacitated person in securing the incapacitated person’s rights under the Home Care Consumer Bill of Rights Act.

(3) A home care consumer or an incapacitated person who is not a minor child has the right to the assistance of an agent, an attorney, an individual designated pursuant to a power of attorney, or an individual otherwise designated in writing by the home care consumer to act on behalf of the home care consumer in securing his or her rights under the act.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 3.